Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 13. REGULATION OF PROFESSIONALS

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 4008. AGENT CERTIFICATION AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS FOR COMPLEX INSURANCE PRODUCTS

Sec. 4008.001. PURPOSE. Certain insurance products are so complex that the general agent licensing and continuing education requirements are insufficient to ensure the level of agent expertise necessary to safeguard consumer interests. Agents should be equipped with the necessary skills and knowledge to assist insureds appropriately in their purchases. Requiring agent training or demonstration of knowledge before an agent may sell particularly complex products mitigates the negative impact caused by agents selling complex products without the training and knowledge necessary to sell those products in a manner that is fair and beneficial to insureds.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 4008.002. TRAINING AND EXAMINATION REQUIREMENTS AUTHORIZED. (a) The commissioner may adopt rules requiring an agent who holds a license issued under this code to be certified, through specific education, training, examination, and experience requirements as provided by this chapter, before an agent may sell a product or product line designated by the commissioner.

(b) Education, training, examination, and experience requirements established by rule under this chapter may be used to satisfy any other agent education, training, examination, and experience requirements otherwise established under this code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 4008.003. RULES. (a) In adopting rules under this chapter, the commissioner shall:

(1) designate the products or product lines that may not be sold without certification under this chapter; and

(2) specify the reasons why it is necessary that the sale of a designated product or product line requires education, experience, or examination.

(b) By rule, the commissioner may specify:

(1) any precertification education or experience that must be completed before a designated product or product line may be sold by an agent;

(2) whether an agent must complete a precertification examination concerning the designated product or product line the agent intends to sell;

(3) whether an agent certified under this chapter must complete specific continuing education to maintain the certificate; and

(4) whether, and if so, how frequently, an agent certified under this chapter must periodically retake the examination to maintain the certificate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 4008.004. APPLICATION OF CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS TO CERTAIN AGENTS. (a) The commissioner by rule shall establish whether the certification requirements established under this chapter for sale by an agent of a designated product or product line apply:

(1) only to an agent who, as of the effective date of the certification requirement, does not hold the underlying agent license required to sell that product or product line; or

(2) to each licensed agent who engages in the sale of that product or product line.

(b) If the commissioner adopts rules requiring each agent described by Subsection (a)(2) to be certified under this chapter, the rules must specify the date by which the agent must comply with the certification requirements.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 4008.005. ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATE. The department shall issue a certificate under this chapter to an agent if the department determines that the agent:

(1) has submitted a properly completed certification application to the department in a form acceptable to the department;

(2) has completed, within the 12-month period preceding the date of the certification application, all requirements for the certification required by rules adopted under this chapter; and

(3) has not committed an act for which a license or certification may be denied under Subchapter C, Chapter 4005.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 4008.006. CERTIFICATE EXPIRATION. Unless the commissioner by rule specifies a different period, each certificate issued under this chapter expires on the expiration date of the agent's appropriate underlying license.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 4008.007. CERTIFICATE RENEWAL. (a) An agent may renew an unexpired certificate before the expiration of the certificate by:

(1) completing all renewal requirements established by rule under this chapter; and

(2) filing a properly completed renewal application with the department in a form acceptable to the department.

(b) A person may not renew a certificate that has been suspended or revoked.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 4008.008. ADMINISTRATION BY TESTING SERVICE AUTHORIZED. The commissioner may accept an examination administered by a testing service, as provided under Subchapter B, Chapter 4002, to satisfy an examination requirement required by rule under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (H.B. 2456), Sec. 5, eff. June 19, 2009.